Georgia, session 2025_26, HB510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 19-6-15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to child support
guidelines for determining amount of award, continuation of duty of support, and duration
of support, is amended by revising subsection (e) as follows:
"(e)(1) Duration of child support responsibility. The duty to provide support for a
minor child shall continue until the child reaches the age of majority, dies, marries, or
becomes emancipated, whichever first occurs; provided, however, that, in any temporary,
final, or modified order for child support with respect to any proceeding for divorce,
separate maintenance, legitimacy, or paternity entered on or after July 1, 1992, the court,
in the exercise of sound discretion, may direct either or both parents to provide financial
H. B. 510
- 1 -

LC 48 1477
assistance to a child who has not previously married or become emancipated, who is
enrolled in and attending a secondary school, and who has attained the age of majority
before completing his or her secondary school education, provided that such financial
assistance shall not be required after a child attains 20 years of age. The provisions for
child support provided in this subsection paragraph may be enforced by either parent, by
any nonparent custodian, by a guardian appointed to receive child support for the child
for whose benefit the child support is ordered, or by the child for whose benefit the child
support is ordered.
(2) Duration of child support for postsecondary education. In any temporary, final,
or modified order for child support with respect to any proceeding for divorce, separate
maintenance, legitimacy, or paternity entered on or after July 1, 2025, the court, in the
exercise of sound discretion, may direct either or both parents to provide financial
assistance to a child who is enrolled in and attending a technical school, vocational
school, college, university, or other institution of postsecondary education, provided that
such financial assistance shall not be required after a child attains 24 years of age. The
court shall require verification of such enrollment and attendance. In determining the
amount of such financial assistance, the court shall consider the amount of tuition as well
as additional fees and expenses related to such enrollment and attendance. The
provisions for child support provided in this paragraph may be enforced by either parent,
by any nonparent custodian, by a guardian appointed to receive child support for the child
for whose benefit the child support is ordered, or by the child for whose benefit the child
support is ordered."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall apply to all support orders entered
on or after such date.
H. B. 510
- 2 -

LC 48 1477
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 510
- 3 -